Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
County Park System

§ 55-9-81.
Creation of commission; composition; members.

The board of supervisors of any county may create a county park commission and appoint five (5) members thereto who shall be designated as park commissioners. Each member of the commission shall be a qualified elector of the county, and there shall be one (1) member from each supervisors district. The terms of the members shall be concurrent with the supervisors, and they shall receive such compensation as may be provided by the board. The commission shall elect one (1) of its members as chairman of such commission and another of them as treasurer, and the treasurer shall give bond in such amount as the board of supervisors shall require payable to the county.

The board of supervisors of such county shall have the power to remove any member of such commission for inefficiency or incompetency, or for any other just cause.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 494, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 55-9-83.
Operating funds; general powers of commission.

The board of supervisors of such county may allocate and pay to such park commission annually such funds as may in their discretion be necessary properly to operate and maintain parks and outdoor recreation facilities. All funds in the hands of the park commission shall be placed in the county depository and shall be considered county funds.

The park commission shall devote all moneys allocated for such purpose by the county governing authorities, by gift, by revenue, or from any other source, for the payment of all maintenance and operating expenses, the purchase of parks and equipment, the erection and construction of buildings, the repair and replacement thereof, and for the extension of recreational facilities for the wholesome and healthful recreation of all citizens of the county.

The county park commission shall have full jurisdiction of all funds coming into its possession either by allocation by the board of supervisors or by gift or by revenue derived from the operation of said parks, and shall have authority to make all contracts in relation to the same.

The county park commission shall have authority to make bylaws for the holding and conducting of its meetings and such other regulations as it may deem necessary for the safe, economic and efficient management of such parks and providing for wholesome and healthful recreation to all the citizens of such county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 494, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 55-9-85.
Employees of commission; operation of facilities; fees.

The county park commission shall have authority to employ a park superintendent or manager who shall have actual charge of such parks and the enforcement and execution of all rules, regulations, and the direction of all programs and festivities, and the operation of all devices for recreation installed therein.

The commissioners are authorized to elect such other officers and appoint such employees as may be necessary to maintain the said parks, and shall have entire control and management of said parks, playgrounds and swimming pools together with all property connected or in anywise appertaining to the same. Further, they shall have the right to fix the salaries of all employees and to direct them in the discharge of their duties; they shall have the right to discharge employees when found inefficient or for other good cause.

The county park commission shall have the power to make and collect fees for use of the park and for the use of any other amusement device that may be installed as well as the leasing of concessions or privileges for the sale of soft drinks, confections, popcorn, peanuts or other such articles; or such commission may operate such business.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 494, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 55-9-87.
Cooperation of commission with other authorities.

The county park commission may cooperate and join with the governing authority of any municipality or any park commission or authority created and authorized by the governing authority of any municipality in establishing, maintaining and operating any public park or recreation facility or facilities, and may cooperate and join with the board of supervisors of any other county or a county park commission created by authority of such board of supervisors of another county in establishing, maintaining and operating any public park or recreation facility or facilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 494, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 55-9-89.
Insurance; purchases and contracts; reports.

The county park commission is authorized to insure all property against loss by fire and tornado, and to carry property damage and other miscellaneous casualty insurance, as in the discretion of said commission may be deemed proper, and pay premiums therefor out of the funds appropriated by the board of supervisors or revenues derived in the operation of such parks.

The conduct of business and all purchases and contracts made and entered into by a park commission created under Sections 55-9-81 through 55-9-93 shall be governed by the provisions of Title 19, Chapter 13, Mississippi Code of 1972. They shall purchase all supplies for said parks, in the manner now provided by law for the purchase of such supplies by the board of supervisors, and shall issue vouchers in payment therefor. They shall report quarterly to the board of supervisors of the county all their doings and transactions of any kind whatsoever, and shall make a complete statement of the financial condition of such park commission at the end of each quarter, and shall annually make a detailed statement covering the entire management and operation of said parks, and may make any recommendations which they may have for further development of such parks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 494, § 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 23; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 27; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 36; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 37; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 34; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 33; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 34; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 34; Laws, 1992, ch. 491 § 36, eff from and after passage (approved May 12, 1992).

§ 55-9-91.
Construction.

Sections 55-9-81 through 55-9-93 shall be liberally construed to promote the efficient maintenance and operation of county parks and recreation facilities to the end that it may result in the improvement of the outdoor recreation facilities and parks of the county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 494, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1974).

§ 55-9-93.
Appropriation and expenditure of funds.

The board of supervisors is hereby authorized and empowered to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for the purpose of constructing, supporting and maintaining parks, playgrounds and recreational facilities in such county, and the funds so appropriated shall be used for no purpose except as provided in Sections 55-9-81 through 55-9-93.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 494, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 44, eff from and after October 1, 1986.